src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx ! 
aids+Sem/Dummytag:aids BERN_NOUN ; ! preliminary. check
mail+Sem/Dummytag:mail BERN_NOUN ; ! preliminary. check
gaedtie+Sem/Dummytag: GAEDTIE ;
jillie+Sem/Dummytag:jill JILLIE ; !jillebe, jillemes
luvlie+Sem/Dummytag:luvl JILLIE ; !luvlebe, luvlemes
minngie+Sem/Dummytag:minng JILLIE ;
vuelie+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag: VUELIE ;
